test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_C_makizin_gt-norm.yaml
     #Isolation form
     makizin: makizin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     +Px1makizin: nimakizin
     +Px2makizin: gimakizin
     +Px3makizin: omakizin
     +PxIndefmakizin: imakizin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     makizin+Dim: makizinens
     makizin+Con: makizinenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     makizin+Pos: makizinim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     makizin+Pej: makizinish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5
     makizin+Pos1Pl: makizininaan
     makizin+PosPl: makiziniwaa
     makizin+PosObv: makizinini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     makizin+Pret: makiziniban
     makizin+VocPl: makizin***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     makizin+Obv: makizinan
     makizin+Pl: makizinag
     makizin+Loc: makizining
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     +Px1makizin+Dim: nimakizinens
     +Px1makizin+Con: nimakizinenh
     +Px2makizin+Dim: gimakizinens
     +Px2makizin+Con: gimakizinenh
     +Px3makizin+Dim: omakizinens
     +Px3makizin+Con: omakizinenh
     +PxIndefmakizin+Dim: imakizinens
     +PxIndefmakizin+Con: imakizinenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     +Px1makizin+Pos: nimakizinim
     +Px2makizin+Pos: gimakizinim
     +Px3makizin+Pos: omakizinim
     +PxIndefmakizin+Pos: imakizinim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     +Px1makizin+Pej: nimakizinish
     +Px2makizin+Pej: gimakizinish
     +Px3makizin+Pej: omakizinish
     +PxIndefmakizin+Pej: imakizinish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     +Px1makizin+Pos1Pl: nimakizininaan
     +Px1makizin+PosPl: nimakiziniwaa
     +Px1makizin+PosObv: nimakizinini
     +Px2makizin+Pos1Pl: gimakizininaan
     +Px2makizin+PosPl: gimakiziniwaa
     +Px2makizin+PosObv: gimakizinini
     +Px3makizin+Pos1Pl: omakizininaan
     +Px3makizin+PosPl: omakiziniwaa
     +Px3makizin+PosObv: omakizinini
     +PxIndefmakizin+Pos1Pl: imakizininaan
     +PxIndefmakizin+PosPl: imakiziniwaa
     +PxIndefmakizin+PosObv: imakizinini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     +Px1makizin+Pret: nimakiziniban
     +Px1makizin+VocPl: nimakizin***idig, idog***
     +Px2makizin+Pret: gimakiziniban
     +Px2makizin+VocPl: gimakizin***idig, idog***
     +Px3makizin+Pret: omakiziniban
     +Px3makizin+VocPl: omakizin***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmakizin+Pret: imakiziniban
     +PxIndefmakizin+VocPl: imakizin***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     +Px1makizin+Obv: nimakizinan
     +Px1makizin+Pl: nimakizinag
     +Px1makizin+Loc: nimakizining
     +Px2makizin+Obv: gimakizinan
     +Px2makizin+Pl: gimakizinag
     +Px2makizin+Loc: gimakizining
     +Px3makizin+Obv: omakizinan
     +Px3makizin+Pl: omakizinag
     +Px3makizin+Loc: omakizining
     +PxIndefmakizin+Obv: imakizinan
     +PxIndefmakizin+Pl: imakizinag
     +PxIndefmakizin+Loc: imakizining
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     makizin+Dim+Pos: makizinensim
     makizin+Con+Pos: makizinenhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     makizin+Dim+Pej: makizinensish
     makizin+Con+Pej: makizinenhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5
     makizin+Dim+Pos1Pl: makizinensinaan
     makizin+Dim+PosPl: makizinensiwaa
     makizin+Dim+PosObv: makizinensini
     makizin+Con+Pos1Pl: makizinenhinaan
     makizin+Con+PosPl: makizinenhiwaa
     makizin+Con+PosObv: makizinenhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     makizin+Dim+Pret: makizinensiban
     makizin+Dim+VocPl: makizinens***idig, idog***
     makizin+Con+Pret: makizinenhiban
     makizin+Con+VocPl: makizinenh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     makizin+Dim+Obv: makizinensan
     makizin+Dim+Pl: makizinensag
     makizin+Dim+Loc: makizinensing
     makizin+Con+Obv: makizinenhan
     makizin+Con+Pl: makizinenhag
     makizin+Con+Loc: makizinenhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     makizin+Pos+Pej: makizinimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     makizin+Pos+Pos1Pl: makiziniminaan
     makizin+Pos+PosPl: makizinimiwaa
     makizin+Pos+PosObv: makizinimini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 6
     makizin+Pos+Pret: makizinimiban
     makizin+Pos+VocPl: makizinim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 7
     makizin+Pos+Obv: makiziniman
     makizin+Pos+Pl: makizinimag
     makizin+Pos+Loc: makiziniming
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5
     makizin+Pej+Pos1Pl: makizinishinaan
     makizin+Pej+PosPl: makizinishiwaa
     makizin+Pej+PosObv: makizinishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     makizin+Pej+Pret: makizinishiban
     makizin+Pej+VocPl: makizinish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     makizin+Pej+Obv: makizinishan
     makizin+Pej+Pl: makizinishag
     makizin+Pej+Loc: makizinishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 6
     makizin+Pos1Pl+Pret: makizininaaniban
     makizin+Pos1Pl+VocPl: makizininaan***idig, idog***
     makizin+PosPl+Pret: makiziniwaaiban
     makizin+PosPl+VocPl: makiziniwaa***idig, idog***
     makizin+PosObv+Pret: makizininiiban
     makizin+PosObv+VocPl: makizinini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 7
     makizin+Pos1Pl+Obv: makizininaanan
     makizin+Pos1Pl+Pl: makizininaanag
     makizin+Pos1Pl+Loc: makizininaaning
     makizin+PosPl+Obv: makiziniwaaan
     makizin+PosPl+Pl: makiziniwaaag
     makizin+PosPl+Loc: makiziniwaaing
     makizin+PosObv+Obv: makizininian
     makizin+PosObv+Pl: makizininiag
     makizin+PosObv+Loc: makizininiing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     makizin+Pret+Obv: makizinibanan
     makizin+Pret+Pl: makizinibanag
     makizin+Pret+Loc: makizinibaning
     makizin+VocPl+Obv: makizin***idig, idog***an
     makizin+VocPl+Pl: makizin***idig, idog***ag
     makizin+VocPl+Loc: makizin***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     +Px1makizin+Dim+Pos: nimakizinensim
     +Px1makizin+Con+Pos: nimakizinenhim
     +Px2makizin+Dim+Pos: gimakizinensim
     +Px2makizin+Con+Pos: gimakizinenhim
     +Px3makizin+Dim+Pos: omakizinensim
     +Px3makizin+Con+Pos: omakizinenhim
     +PxIndefmakizin+Dim+Pos: imakizinensim
     +PxIndefmakizin+Con+Pos: imakizinenhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     +Px1makizin+Dim+Pej: nimakizinensish
     +Px1makizin+Con+Pej: nimakizinenhish
     +Px2makizin+Dim+Pej: gimakizinensish
     +Px2makizin+Con+Pej: gimakizinenhish
     +Px3makizin+Dim+Pej: omakizinensish
     +Px3makizin+Con+Pej: omakizinenhish
     +PxIndefmakizin+Dim+Pej: imakizinensish
     +PxIndefmakizin+Con+Pej: imakizinenhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     +Px1makizin+Dim+Pos1Pl: nimakizinensinaan
     +Px1makizin+Dim+PosPl: nimakizinensiwaa
     +Px1makizin+Dim+PosObv: nimakizinensini
     +Px1makizin+Con+Pos1Pl: nimakizinenhinaan
     +Px1makizin+Con+PosPl: nimakizinenhiwaa
     +Px1makizin+Con+PosObv: nimakizinenhini
     +Px2makizin+Dim+Pos1Pl: gimakizinensinaan
     +Px2makizin+Dim+PosPl: gimakizinensiwaa
     +Px2makizin+Dim+PosObv: gimakizinensini
     +Px2makizin+Con+Pos1Pl: gimakizinenhinaan
     +Px2makizin+Con+PosPl: gimakizinenhiwaa
     +Px2makizin+Con+PosObv: gimakizinenhini
     +Px3makizin+Dim+Pos1Pl: omakizinensinaan
     +Px3makizin+Dim+PosPl: omakizinensiwaa
     +Px3makizin+Dim+PosObv: omakizinensini
     +Px3makizin+Con+Pos1Pl: omakizinenhinaan
     +Px3makizin+Con+PosPl: omakizinenhiwaa
     +Px3makizin+Con+PosObv: omakizinenhini
     +PxIndefmakizin+Dim+Pos1Pl: imakizinensinaan
     +PxIndefmakizin+Dim+PosPl: imakizinensiwaa
     +PxIndefmakizin+Dim+PosObv: imakizinensini
     +PxIndefmakizin+Con+Pos1Pl: imakizinenhinaan
     +PxIndefmakizin+Con+PosPl: imakizinenhiwaa
     +PxIndefmakizin+Con+PosObv: imakizinenhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     +Px1makizin+Dim+Pret: nimakizinensiban
     +Px1makizin+Dim+VocPl: nimakizinens***idig, idog***
     +Px1makizin+Con+Pret: nimakizinenhiban
     +Px1makizin+Con+VocPl: nimakizinenh***idig, idog***
     +Px2makizin+Dim+Pret: gimakizinensiban
     +Px2makizin+Dim+VocPl: gimakizinens***idig, idog***
     +Px2makizin+Con+Pret: gimakizinenhiban
     +Px2makizin+Con+VocPl: gimakizinenh***idig, idog***
     +Px3makizin+Dim+Pret: omakizinensiban
     +Px3makizin+Dim+VocPl: omakizinens***idig, idog***
     +Px3makizin+Con+Pret: omakizinenhiban
     +Px3makizin+Con+VocPl: omakizinenh***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmakizin+Dim+Pret: imakizinensiban
     +PxIndefmakizin+Dim+VocPl: imakizinens***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmakizin+Con+Pret: imakizinenhiban
     +PxIndefmakizin+Con+VocPl: imakizinenh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     +Px1makizin+Dim+Obv: nimakizinensan
     +Px1makizin+Dim+Pl: nimakizinensag
     +Px1makizin+Dim+Loc: nimakizinensing
     +Px1makizin+Con+Obv: nimakizinenhan
     +Px1makizin+Con+Pl: nimakizinenhag
     +Px1makizin+Con+Loc: nimakizinenhing
     +Px2makizin+Dim+Obv: gimakizinensan
     +Px2makizin+Dim+Pl: gimakizinensag
     +Px2makizin+Dim+Loc: gimakizinensing
     +Px2makizin+Con+Obv: gimakizinenhan
     +Px2makizin+Con+Pl: gimakizinenhag
     +Px2makizin+Con+Loc: gimakizinenhing
     +Px3makizin+Dim+Obv: omakizinensan
     +Px3makizin+Dim+Pl: omakizinensag
     +Px3makizin+Dim+Loc: omakizinensing
     +Px3makizin+Con+Obv: omakizinenhan
     +Px3makizin+Con+Pl: omakizinenhag
     +Px3makizin+Con+Loc: omakizinenhing
     +PxIndefmakizin+Dim+Obv: imakizinensan
     +PxIndefmakizin+Dim+Pl: imakizinensag
     +PxIndefmakizin+Dim+Loc: imakizinensing
     +PxIndefmakizin+Con+Obv: imakizinenhan
     +PxIndefmakizin+Con+Pl: imakizinenhag
     +PxIndefmakizin+Con+Loc: imakizinenhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     +Px1makizin+Pos+Pej: nimakizinimish
     +Px2makizin+Pos+Pej: gimakizinimish
     +Px3makizin+Pos+Pej: omakizinimish
     +PxIndefmakizin+Pos+Pej: imakizinimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     +Px1makizin+Pos+Pos1Pl: nimakiziniminaan
     +Px1makizin+Pos+PosPl: nimakizinimiwaa
     +Px1makizin+Pos+PosObv: nimakizinimini
     +Px2makizin+Pos+Pos1Pl: gimakiziniminaan
     +Px2makizin+Pos+PosPl: gimakizinimiwaa
     +Px2makizin+Pos+PosObv: gimakizinimini
     +Px3makizin+Pos+Pos1Pl: omakiziniminaan
     +Px3makizin+Pos+PosPl: omakizinimiwaa
     +Px3makizin+Pos+PosObv: omakizinimini
     +PxIndefmakizin+Pos+Pos1Pl: imakiziniminaan
     +PxIndefmakizin+Pos+PosPl: imakizinimiwaa
     +PxIndefmakizin+Pos+PosObv: imakizinimini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     +Px1makizin+Pos+Pret: nimakizinimiban
     +Px1makizin+Pos+VocPl: nimakizinim***idig, idog***
     +Px2makizin+Pos+Pret: gimakizinimiban
     +Px2makizin+Pos+VocPl: gimakizinim***idig, idog***
     +Px3makizin+Pos+Pret: omakizinimiban
     +Px3makizin+Pos+VocPl: omakizinim***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmakizin+Pos+Pret: imakizinimiban
     +PxIndefmakizin+Pos+VocPl: imakizinim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     +Px1makizin+Pos+Obv: nimakiziniman
     +Px1makizin+Pos+Pl: nimakizinimag
     +Px1makizin+Pos+Loc: nimakiziniming
     +Px2makizin+Pos+Obv: gimakiziniman
     +Px2makizin+Pos+Pl: gimakizinimag
     +Px2makizin+Pos+Loc: gimakiziniming
     +Px3makizin+Pos+Obv: omakiziniman
     +Px3makizin+Pos+Pl: omakizinimag
     +Px3makizin+Pos+Loc: omakiziniming
     +PxIndefmakizin+Pos+Obv: imakiziniman
     +PxIndefmakizin+Pos+Pl: imakizinimag
     +PxIndefmakizin+Pos+Loc: imakiziniming
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     +Px1makizin+Pej+Pos1Pl: nimakizinishinaan
     +Px1makizin+Pej+PosPl: nimakizinishiwaa
     +Px1makizin+Pej+PosObv: nimakizinishini
     +Px2makizin+Pej+Pos1Pl: gimakizinishinaan
     +Px2makizin+Pej+PosPl: gimakizinishiwaa
     +Px2makizin+Pej+PosObv: gimakizinishini
     +Px3makizin+Pej+Pos1Pl: omakizinishinaan
     +Px3makizin+Pej+PosPl: omakizinishiwaa
     +Px3makizin+Pej+PosObv: omakizinishini
